cs: Elektronika > Tisk, kopírování, skenování a faxování > Skenery – příslušenství: Příslušenství pro skenování filmů; Kalibrační listy skeneru; Přenosná pouzdra na skenery; Sady na čištění skenerů; Sady válečků skeneru
ro-RO: Electronice > Imprimare, copiere, scanare și fax > Accesorii scanere: Accesorii pentru scanarea filmelor; Foi de calibrare pentru scanere; Huse de transport scanere; Seturi de curățare pentru scanere; Kituri de role pentru scanere
bg-BG: Електроника > Печат, копиране, сканиране и факс > Аксесоари за скенери: Аксесоари за сканиране на филм; Калибрационни листове за скенер; Чанти за носене на скенери; Комплекти за почистване на скенери; Комплекти ролки за скенер
fi: Elektroniikka > Tulostus, kopiointi, skannaus ja faksaus > Skannerin lisätarvikkeet: Filminskannauslisävaruste; Skannerin kalibrointipaperi; Skannerin kantokotelot; Skannerin puhdistussarjat; Skanneritelakokonaisuus
de: Elektronik > Drucken, Kopieren, Scannen & Faxen > Scannerzubehör: Film-Scan-Zubehör; Scanner-Kalibrierungsblätter; Transporttaschen für Scanner; Reinigungskits für Scanner; Scanner-Walzensätze
pt-BR: Eletrônicos > Impressão, cópia, digitalização e fax > Acessórios para scanner: Acessórios para digitalização de filmes; Folhas de calibração para scanner; Estojos de transporte para scanner; Kits para limpeza de scanner; Kit de rolos para scanner
sv: Elektronik > Utskrift, kopiering, skanning och fax > Skannertillbehör: Filmskanningstillbehör; Skannerkalibreringspapper; Skannerväskor; Skannerrengöringsenheter; Skannerrullkit
it: Elettronica > Stampa, copia, scansione e fax > Accessori per scanner: Accessori di scansione dei film; Fogli di calibrazione dello scanner; Custodie per scanner; Kit di pulizia dello scanner; Kit di rulli dello scanner
fr: Appareil électronique > Impression, copie, numérisation et télécopie > Accessoires pour scanner: Accessoires de numérisation de film; Feuilles d’étalonnage de scanner; Mallettes de transport pour scanners; Kits de nettoyage pour scanners; Kits de rouleaux de scanner
ja: 電子機器 > プリンター・コピー機 > スキャナー関連用品: フィルムスキャン用アクセサリー; スキャナーキャリブレーションシート; スキャナー持ち運び用ケース; スキャナークリーニングキット; スキャナーローラーキット
hu: Elektronika > Nyomtatás, másolás, szkennelés és faxolás > Szkennerkiegészítők: Filmszkennelési kiegészítők; Szkennerkalibrációs lapok; Szkennerhordozó-tokok; Szkennertisztító készletek; Szkennergörgő-készletek
da: Elektronik > Udskriv, kopiér, scan og fax > Scanner – tilbehør: Film-scanningstilbehør; Scanner – kalibreringsark; Bæretasker til scanner; Rengøringssæt til scanner; Scanner – rullesæt
pt-PT: Eletrónica > Impressão, cópia, digitalização e fax > Acessórios de leitor: Acessórios de digitalização de filme; Folhas de calibração de scanner; Estojos de transporte para scanners; Kits de limpeza para scanners; Kit de rolos de scanner
zh-CN: 电子产品 > 打印/复印/扫描/传真 > 扫描仪配件: 胶片扫描配件; 扫描仪校准纸; 扫描仪便携箱; 扫描仪清洁套件; 扫描仪滚轮套件
zh-TW: 電子器材 > 多功能事務機 > 掃描器配件: 膠捲掃描配件; 掃描器校準紙; 掃描器攜帶箱; 掃描器清潔工具包; 掃描器滾筒套組
lt-LT: Elektronika > Spausdinimas, kopijavimas, nuskaitymas ir faksas > Skaitytuvų priedai: Plėvelių skenavimo priedai; Skaitytuvų kalibravimo lapai; Skaitytuvų nešiojimo dėklai; Skaitytuvų valymo rinkiniai; Skaitytuvų volelių rinkiniai
sl-SI: Elektronika > Tiskanje, kopiranje, skeniranje in faksiranje > Dodatki za optični bralnik: Dodatki za skeniranje filmov; Kalibracijski listi za skenerje; Torbice za optične bralnike; Kompleti za čiščenje optičnega bralnika; Kompleti valjev za skenerje
ko: 전자기기 > 인쇄/ 복사/스캔/팩스 > 스캐너 부대용품: 필름 스캔 액세서리; 스캐너 캘리브레이션 시트; 스캐너 운반 케이스; 스캐너 청소 키트; 스캐너 롤러 키트
tr: Elektronik > Yazıcı, Fotokopi, Tarayıcı ve Faks > Tarayıcı Aksesuarları: Film Tarama Aksesuarları; Tarayıcı Kalibrasyon Sayfaları; Tarayıcı Taşıma Çantaları; Tarayıcı Temizleme Setleri; Tarayıcı Rulo Kitleri
hr-HR: Elektronika > Ispis, kopiranje, skeniranje i faksiranje > Dodaci za skener: Dodaci za skeniranje filma; Kalibracijski listovi za skener; Torbe za skener; Kompleti za čišćenje skenera; Kompleti valjaka za skener
sk-SK: Elektronika > Tlač, kopírovanie, skenovanie a faxovanie > Príslušenstvo pre skenery: Príslušenstvo na skenovanie filmov; Kalibračné hárky skenerov; Puzdrá na prenos skenerov; Súpravy na čistenie skenerov; Súpravy valčekov skenerov
nl: Elektronica > Afdrukken, kopiëren, scannen en faxen > Scanneraccessoires: Filmscan-accessoires; Scanner-kalibratiebladen; Scannerdraagdozen; Scannerreinigingskits; Scanner-rollerset
el: Ηλεκτρονικά > Εκτύπωση, Αντιγραφή, Σάρωση & Φαξ > Αξεσουάρ σαρωτή: Αξεσουάρ σάρωσης φιλμ; Φύλλα βαθμονόμησης σαρωτή; Θήκες μεταφοράς σαρωτή; Κιτ καθαρισμού σαρωτή; Κιτ κυλίνδρων σαρωτή
nb: Elektronikk > Utskrift, kopi, skann og faks > Skannertilbehør: Filmskanningtilbehør; Skannerkalibreringark; Bærevesker for skannere; Rengjøringssett for skannere; Skannerrullesett
vi: Thiết bị điện tử > In, photocopy, quét & fax > Phụ kiện máy quét: Phụ kiện quét phim; Tờ hiệu chuẩn scanner; Hộp đựng máy quét; Bộ dụng cụ vệ sinh máy quét; Bộ kit con lăn scanner
th: อิเล็กทรอนิกส์ > พิมพ์ คัดลอก สแกน และแฟกซ์ > อุปกรณ์เครื่องสแกน: อุปกรณ์เสริมสแกนฟิล์ม; แผ่นปรับค่าสแกนเนอร์; กระเป๋าใส่เครื่องสแกน; ชุดทำความสะอาดเครื่องสแกน; ชุดโรลเลอร์สแกนเนอร์
pl: Elektronika > Drukowanie, kopiowanie, skanowanie i faksowanie > Akcesoria do skanerów: Akcesoria do skanowania filmów; Arkusze kalibracyjne skanera; Futerały na skanery; Zestawy do czyszczenia skanera; Zestawy rolek skanera
ru: Электроника > Печать, копирование, сканирование и работа с факсами > Аксессуары для сканеров: Аксессуары для сканирования пленок; Калибровочные листы для сканеров; Сумки для сканеров; Наборы для очистки сканеров; Комплекты роликов для сканеров
en: Electronics > Print, Copy, Scan & Fax > Scanner Accessories: Film Scanning Accessories; Scanner Calibration Sheets; Scanner Carrying Cases; Scanner Cleaning Kits; Scanner Roller Kits
es: Electrónica > Fax, escáner, copiadora e impresora > Accesorios para escáner: Accesorios de escaneo de película; Hojas de calibración de escáner; Estuches de transporte para escáner; Kits de limpieza para escáner; Kit de rodillos de escáner